Florida, session 2026, HB1243.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 627.171, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
627.171 Excess rates.—
(2)(a) An insurer may not use excess rates pursuant to
this section, only as follows:
1. For no more than 10 percent of its commercial insurance
policies written or renewed in each calendar year for any line
of commercial insurance, other than workers' compensation.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1243 2026
2. For no more than 20 percent of its workers'
compensation insurance policies written or renewed in each
calendar year. or
3. For no more than 5 percent of its personal lines
insurance policies written or renewed in each calendar year for
any line of personal insurance.
(b) In determining the 20 percent 10-percent limitation
for workers' compensation commercial insurance policies, the
insurer shall exclude any workers' compensation policy that was
written for an employer who had coverage in the joint
underwriting plan created by s. 627.311(5) immediately before
prior to the writing of the policy by the insurer and any
workers' compensation policy that was written for an employer
who had been offered coverage in the joint underwriting plan but
who was written a policy by the insurer in lieu of accepting the
joint underwriting plan policy. Such These workers' compensation
policies must shall be excluded from the 20 percent 10-percent
limitation for the first 3 years of coverage.
Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 631.912, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
631.912 Board of directors.—
(1) The board of directors of the corporation shall be
composed consist of nine 11 persons, one 1 of whom is the
insurance consumer advocate appointed under s. 627.0613 or his
or her designee and one 1 of whom is designated by the Chief
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1243 2026
Financial Officer. The department shall appoint to the board
four 6 persons selected by private carriers from among the 20
workers' compensation insurers with the largest amount of direct
written premium as determined by the department, one person
nominated by a statewide trade association representing Florida
employers, which is designated by the Chief Financial Officer,
and one person nominated by the largest property and casualty
insurance agents association in this state. The Chief Financial
Officer may appoint and 2 persons selected by the self-insurance
funds or other persons with experience in workers' compensation
insurance to the board to serve in place of a nominee of either
association as determined by the Chief Financial Officer. These
appointments are deemed to be within the scope of the exemption
provided in s. 112.313(7)(b). The Governor shall appoint one
person who has commercial insurance experience. At least two of
the private carriers shall be foreign carriers authorized to do
business in this state. The board shall elect a chair
chairperson from among its members. The Chief Financial Officer
may remove any board member for cause. Each board member shall
be appointed to serve a 4-year term and may be reappointed. A
vacancy on the board must shall be filled for the remaining
period of the term in the same manner by which the original
appointment was made.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1243-00